Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2825.02
Interchangeable biological product, defined.

Interchangeable biological product means a biological product that the federal Food and Drug Administration:

(1) Has licensed and has determined meets the standards for interchangeability pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 262(k)(4), as such section existed on January 1, 2017, or as set forth in the Lists of Licensed Biological Products with Reference Product Exclusivity and Biosimilarity or Interchangeability Evaluations published by the federal Food and Drug Administration, as such publication existed on January 1, 2017; or

(2) Has determined is therapeutically equivalent as set forth in the Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations of the federal Food and Drug Administration, as such publication existed on January 1, 2017.

Laws 2017, LB481, § 11.